Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.230

Emergency acts on Sunday authorized.

Any writ or process authorized by this chapter may be issued and served, in cases of emergency, on Sunday.

[Code 1881 s 686; 1877 p 141 s 690; 1869 p 159 s 626; 1854 p 214 s 454; RRS s 1084.]

NOTES:

Superior court, issuance of habeas corpus on nonjudicial days: State Constitution Art. 4 s 6 (Amendment 28).